Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1016
Order of attachment; return; contents.

The officer shall return upon every order of attachment what he or she has done under it. The return must show when and how the defendant was served, and the property attached and the time it was attached. When garnishees are served, their names and the time each was served must be stated. The officer shall also return with the order all undertakings given under it.

R.S.1867, Code § 211, p. 427;

R.S.1913, § 7745;

C.S.1922, § 8689;

C.S.1929, § 20-1016;

R.S.1943, § 25-1016;

Laws 1980, LB 597, § 8.

Return not describing appraisement is sufficient after judgment. Grebe v. Jones, 15 Neb. 312, 18 N.W. 81 (1883).

Irregular to permit amendment without showing, so as to release property. Griffith v. Short, 14 Neb. 259, 15 N.W. 335 (1883).

Return should state if redelivery bond was given, etc. Hilton v. Ross, 9 Neb. 406, 2 N.W. 862 (1879).